src/third_party/liblouis/src/tables/de-g1-core.cti
#always bitsteuerung 12-24-2345-23456-126-15-1235-136-1345-1245
#always bausteuerung 12-16-23456-126-15-1235-136-1345-1245
midendword steufel 234-2345-126-124-15-123
midendword stext 234-2345-15-1346-2345
always mannsthal 134-1-1345-1345-234-2345-125-1-123
midendword stheat 234-2345-125-15-1-2345
midendword sthema 234-2345-125-15-134-1
midendword sthemen 234-2345-125-15-134-15-1345
midword stheni 234-2345-125-15-1345-24
endword sthenie 234-2345-125-15-1345-346
midword stheno 234-2345-125-15-1345-135
midendword stheo 234-2345-125-15-135
midendword stherap 234-2345-125-15-1235-1-1234
endword stherapien 234-2345-125-15-1235-1-1234-24-15-1345
midendword stherm 234-2345-125-15-1235-134
midendword sthese 234-2345-125-15-234-15
midendword sthron 234-2345-125-1235-135-1345
midendword sticket 234-2345-24-14-13-15-2345
midendword stief 234-2345-346-124
always stief 23456-346-124
always stiefel 23456-346-124-15-123
always eucharistiefeier 126-1456-1-1235-24-23456-346-124-146-15-1235
always stiefbruder 23456-346-124-12-1235-136-145-15-1235
always stiefbrüder 23456-346-124-12-1235-1256-145-15-1235
always stiefgeschwister 23456-346-124-1245-15-156-2456-24-23456-15-1235
always stiefkind 23456-346-124-13-24-1345-145
always stiefmutter 23456-346-124-134-136-2345-2345-15-1235
always stiefmütter 23456-346-124-134-1256-2345-2345-15-1235
always stiefschwester 23456-346-124-156-2456-15-23456-15-1235
always stiefsohn 23456-346-124-234-135-125-1345
always stiefsöhne 23456-346-124-234-246-125-1345-15
always stieftochter 23456-346-124-2345-135-1456-2345-15-1235
always stieftöchter 23456-346-124-2345-246-1456-2345-15-1235
always stiefvater 23456-346-124-1236-1-2345-15-1235
always stiefväter 23456-346-124-1236-345-2345-15-1235
midendword stilgen 234-2345-24-123-1245-15-1345
midendword stilgung 234-2345-24-123-1245-136-1345-1245
midendword stinte 234-2345-24-1345-2345-15
begmidword tastinter 2345-1-23456-24-1345-2345-15-1235
begmidword hostinter 125-135-23456-24-1345-2345-15-1235
always höchst 125-246-1456-23456
always kunst 13-136-1345-23456
begmidword ostintegr 135-23456-24-1345-2345-15-1245-1235
begmidword westintegr 2456-15-23456-24-1345-2345-15-1245-1235
midendword stip 234-2345-24-1234
always stipendi 23456-24-1234-15-1345-145-24
always einstipp 146-1345-23456-24-1234-1234
always gestippt 1245-15-23456-24-1234-1234-2345
always obstipation 135-12-23456-24-1234-1-2345-24-135-1345
always speckstippe 234-1234-15-14-13-23456-24-1234-1234-15
always stippbesuch 23456-24-1234-1234-12-15-234-136-1456
always stippchen 23456-24-1234-1234-1456-15-1345
always stippe 23456-24-1234-1234-15
always stippmilch 23456-24-1234-1234-134-24-123-1456
always stippvisite 23456-24-1234-1234-1236-24-234-24-2345-15
always stipulation 23456-24-1234-136-123-1-2345-24-135-1345
always stipulier 23456-24-1234-136-123-346-1235
midendword stitel 234-2345-24-2345-15-123
midendword stiter 234-2345-24-2345-15-1235
midendword stoast 234-2345-135-1-23456
midendword stochter 234-2345-135-1456-2345-15-1235
midendword stod 234-2345-135-145
always kustode 13-136-23456-135-145-15
midendword stoleran 234-2345-135-123-15-1235-1-1345
midendword stool 234-2345-135-135-123
midendword stopo 234-2345-135-1234-135
midendword storkel 234-2345-135-1235-13-15-123
midendword storte 234-2345-135-1235-2345-15
always stosst 23456-135-234-234-2345
midendword stour 234-2345-135-136-1235
midendword stracht 234-2345-1235-1-1456-2345
midendword stradition 234-2345-1235-1-145-24-2345-24-135-1345
midendword strag 234-2345-1235-1-1245
always estragon 15-23456-1235-1-1245-135-1345
always stragödie 234-2345-1235-1-1245-246-145-24-15
midendword strain 234-2345-1235-1-24-1345
midendword strakt 234-2345-1235-1-13-2345
always abstrakt 1-12-23456-1235-1-13-2345
midendword stranch 234-2345-1235-1-1345-1456
midendword strank 234-2345-1235-1-1345-13
midendword strans 234-2345-1235-1-1345-234
midendword strauer 234-2345-1235-16-15-1235
midendword straum 234-2345-1235-16-134
always gastraum 1245-1-23456-1235-16-134
always lastraum 123-1-23456-1235-16-134
always testraum 2345-15-23456-1235-16-134
always ostraum 135-23456-1235-16-134
midendword straurig 234-2345-1235-16-1235-24-1245
midendword strauung 234-2345-1235-16-136-1345-1245
midendword streff 234-2345-1235-15-124-124
midendword streib 234-2345-1235-146-12
midendword strend 234-2345-1235-15-1345-145
midendword strendite 23456-1235-15-1345-145-24-2345-15
midendword strenn 234-2345-1235-15-1345-1345
begmidword testrenn 2345-15-23456-1235-15-1345-1345
midendword streppe 234-2345-1235-15-1234-1234-15
midendword strete 234-2345-1235-15-2345-15
midendword stribun 234-2345-1235-24-12-136-1345
midendword strieb 234-2345-1235-346-12
always industrie 24-1345-145-136-23456-1235-346
prfword industrien 24-1345-145-136-23456-1235-24-15-1345
always industriell 24-1345-145-136-23456-1235-24-15-123-123
midendword striller 234-2345-1235-24-123-123-15-1235
midendword strink 234-2345-1235-24-1345-13
midendword strog 234-2345-1235-135-1245
always astrog 1-23456-1235-135-1245
always östrogen 246-23456-1235-135-1245-15-1345
midendword strommel 234-2345-1235-135-134-134-15-123
midendword strompete 234-2345-1235-135-134-1234-15-2345-15
midendword stropf 234-2345-1235-135-1234-124
midendword strophäe 234-2345-1235-135-1234-125-345-15
midendword stross 234-2345-1235-135-234-234
midendword strost 234-2345-1235-135-23456
midendword strott 234-2345-1235-135-2345-2345
midendword strug 234-2345-1235-136-1245
midendword struthahn 234-2345-1235-136-2345-125-1-125-1345
midendword strächtig 234-2345-1235-345-1456-2345-24-1245
midendword sträg 234-2345-1235-345-1245
midendword sträne 234-2345-1235-345-1345-15
midendword sträume 234-2345-1235-34-134-15
midendword strög 234-2345-1235-246-1245
midendword ströpf 234-2345-1235-246-1234-124
midendword strüb 234-2345-1235-1256-12
midendword strümmer 234-2345-1235-1256-134-134-15-1235
midendword stuberkul 234-2345-136-12-15-1235-13-136-123
midendword stuch 234-2345-136-1456
midendword stumor 234-2345-136-134-135-1235
midendword stür 234-2345-1256-1235
always stürm 23456-1256-1235-134
always glastürm 1245-123-1-234-2345-1256-1235-134
always gastürm 1245-1-234-2345-1256-1235-134
always aussichtstürm 16-234-234-24-1456-2345-234-2345-1256-1235-134
always beobachtungstürm 12-15-135-12-1-1456-2345-136-1345-1245-234-2345-1256-1235-134
always zwillingstürm 1356-2456-24-123-123-24-1345-1245-234-2345-1256-1235-134
always stürz 23456-1256-1235-1356
always erstürb 15-1235-23456-1256-1235-12
midendword sturbine 234-2345-136-1235-12-24-1345-15
midendword sturbo 234-2345-136-1235-12-135
midendword sturbul 234-2345-136-1235-12-136-123
midendword sturn 234-2345-136-1235-1345
midendword styp 234-2345-13456-1234
midendword styrann 234-2345-13456-1235-1-1345-1345
midendword stäfel 234-2345-345-124-15-123
midendword stäfeln 234-2345-345-124-15-123-1345
midendword stägig 234-2345-345-1245-24-1245
midendword stäglich 234-2345-345-1245-123-24-1456
midendword stäler 234-2345-345-123-15-1235
midendword stänz 234-2345-345-1345-1356
midendword stäter 234-2345-345-2345-15-1235
midendword stäusch 234-2345-34-156
midendword stöchter 234-2345-246-1456-2345-15-1235
midendword stöchter 234-2345-246-1456-2345-15-1235
midendword stöne 234-2345-246-1345-15
always störungstrupp 23456-246-1235-136-1345-1245-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always stösst 23456-246-234-234-2345
midendword stöter 234-2345-246-2345-15-1235
midendword stötung 234-2345-246-2345-136-1345-1245
midendword stüch 234-2345-1256-1456
always stücksteil 23456-1256-14-13-234-2345-146-123
midendword stüft 234-2345-1256-124-2345
midendword stülle 234-2345-1256-123-123-15
midendword stümelei 234-2345-1256-134-15-123-146
midendword stümlich 234-2345-1256-134-123-24-1456
always gestüte 1245-15-23456-1256-2345-15
always eistüte 146-234-2345-1256-2345-15
always kaufstüte 13-16-124-234-2345-1256-2345-15
always süsst 234-1256-234-234-2345
always süsst 234-1256-234-234-2345
always tagesteller 2345-1-1245-15-234-2345-15-123-123-15-1235
always tagsteller 2345-1-1245-234-2345-15-123-123-15-1235
always tagstisch 2345-1-1245-234-2345-24-156
syllable talkshow 2345-1-123-13-234-125-135-2456
syllable thorax 2345-125-135-1235-1-1346
always tischtennistisch 2345-24-156-2345-15-1345-1345-24-234-2345-24-156
syllable trainings 2345-1235-1-24-1345-24-1345-1245-234
always überasst 1256-12-15-1235-1-234-234-2345
always ungstank 136-1345-1245-234-2345-1-1345-13
always ungstat 136-1345-1245-234-2345-1-2345
always ungsteil 136-1345-1245-234-2345-146-123
always ungstisch 136-1345-1245-234-2345-24-156
midendword ungstreu 136-1345-1245-234-2345-1235-126
always ungstrick 136-1345-1245-234-2345-1235-24-14-13
always ungstrupp 136-1345-1245-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always ungsturm 136-1345-1245-234-2345-136-1235-134
always unionstrupp 136-1345-24-135-1345-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always unternehmensteil 136-1345-2345-15-1235-1345-15-125-134-15-1345-234-2345-146-123
always veitstanz 1236-146-2345-234-2345-1-1345-1356
always verbandstisch 1236-15-1235-12-1-1345-145-234-2345-24-156
always vergasst 1236-15-1235-1245-1-234-234-2345
always vergisst 1236-15-1235-1245-24-234-234-2345
always verkaufstisch 1236-15-1235-13-16-124-234-2345-24-156
always verkehrsteil 1236-15-1235-13-15-125-1235-234-2345-146-123
always verkehrsto 1236-15-1235-13-15-125-1235-234-2345-135
always vermasst 1236-15-1235-134-1-234-234-2345
always vermögensteil 1236-15-1235-134-246-1245-15-1345-234-2345-146-123
always verrusst 1236-15-1235-1235-136-234-234-2345
always verspasst 1236-15-1235-234-1234-1-234-234-2345
always versuchstier 1236-15-1235-234-136-1456-234-2345-346-1235
always versöhnungstrunk 1236-15-1235-234-246-125-1345-136-1345-1245-234-2345-1235-136-1345-13
always vertragsteil 1236-15-1235-2345-1235-1-1245-234-2345-146-123
always vertragstreu 1236-15-1235-2345-1235-1-1245-234-2345-1235-126
always volkstanz 1236-135-123-13-234-2345-1-1345-1356
always volkstum 1236-135-123-13-234-2345-136-134
always voraustrupp 1236-135-1235-16-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always wachstum 2456-1-1456-234-2345-136-134
always wahnsinnstat 2456-1-125-1345-234-24-1345-1345-234-2345-1-2345
always weihnachtsteller 2456-146-125-1345-1-1456-2345-234-2345-15-123-123-15-1235
always weihnachtstisch 2456-146-125-1345-1-1456-2345-234-2345-24-156
always weisst 2456-146-234-234-2345
always beweis 12-15-2456-146-234
prfword beweist 12-15-2456-146-23456
always wettbewerbsteil 2456-15-2345-2345-12-15-2456-15-1235-12-234-2345-146-123
always willkommenstrunk 2456-24-123-123-13-135-134-134-15-1345-234-2345-1235-136-1345-13
always wirtshaustisch 2456-24-1235-2345-234-125-16-234-2345-24-156
always wirtstier 2456-24-1235-2345-234-2345-346-1235
always wissenstempel 2456-24-234-234-15-1345-234-2345-15-134-1234-15-123
word wisst 2456-24-234-234-2345
always wusst 2456-136-234-234-2345
always wüsst 2456-1256-234-234-2345
always zeitungstisch 1356-146-2345-136-1345-1245-234-2345-24-156
always zirkustier 1356-24-1235-13-136-234-2345-346-1235
always zugsteil 1356-136-1245-234-2345-146-123
always zwangstaufe 1356-2456-1-1345-1245-234-2345-16-124-15
always zwangstäuf 1356-2456-1-1345-1245-234-2345-34-124
always zwillingsturm 1356-2456-24-123-123-24-1345-1245-234-2345-136-1235-134
